Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1256YH (4) 91 je/js H.F. 283 Section 1. Section 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraphs a and d, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. (1) The state hourly wage shall be at least $6.20 as 3 of April 1, 2007, and $7.25 as of January 1, 2008 $10.00 as of 4 July 1, 2025, $12.50 as of July 1, 2026, and $15.00 as of July 5 1, 2027 . 6 (2) The state hourly wage, including the state hourly wage 7 for the first ninety calendar days of employment provided in 8 paragraph âdâ , shall be increased annually on July 1, beginning 9 July 1, 2028, by the same percentage as the cost-of-living 10 increase, if any, in federal social security benefits 11 authorized during the previous state fiscal year by the federal 12 social security administration pursuant to section 215 of the 13 federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§415. In no case shall 14 the state hourly wage be decreased. 15 d. An employer is not required to pay an employee the 16 applicable state hourly wage provided in paragraph âaâ until the 17 employee has completed ninety calendar days of employment with 18 the employer. An employer shall pay an employee who has not 19 completed ninety calendar days of employment with the employer 20 an hourly wage of at least $5.30 as of April 1, 2007, and $6.35 21 as of January 1, 2008 , $9.10 as of July 1, 2025, $11.60 as of 22 July 1, 2026, and $14.10 as of July 1, 2027 . 23